Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Transportation of Crude Oil

§ 53-3-201.
Required documentation for transportation of crude oil.

The State Oil and Gas Board shall adopt regulations to require any corporation, association, partnership or person in possession of crude petroleum oil or any substance containing any quantity of crude oil or any sediment, water or brine produced in association with the exploration and/or production of oil or gas, or both, being transported or for transportation from or to any storage, disposal, processing, or refining facility to possess specific documentation which substantiates the right to be in possession of such substance. The regulations shall require such documentation to include:

The identity of the operator and the location of the lease from which originated the crude petroleum oil or any substance including any sediment, water or brine produced in association with the exploration or production of oil or gas, or both, if it is purportedly being or to be transported from a lease;

The identity of the operator and the location of the storage facility from which or to which the crude petroleum oil or any substance, including any sediment, water or brine produced in association with the exploration or production of oil or gas, or both, is being or is to be transported;

The identity of the operator and the location of the disposal, processing or refining facility to which the crude petroleum oil or any substance, including any sediment, water or brine produced in association with the exploration and production of oil or gas, or both, is being or is to be transported;

The estimated percentage of crude petroleum oil in the substance, sediment, water or brine produced in association with the exploration or production of oil or gas, or both, which is being or is to be transported;

The volume of crude petroleum oil being or to be transported; and

Any additional information the supervisor of the state oil and gas board finds necessary or appropriate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 511, § 2, eff from and after April 12, 1983.

§ 53-3-203.
Enforcement; penalty.

Any law enforcement officer or the supervisor of the State Oil and Gas Board or his designated employees may at any time inspect and for probable cause impound oil or any substance as defined in Section 53-3-201 and the vehicle transporting it, pending being furnished with the documentation as required by Section 53-3-201 or other proof of ownership or right to possession, whenever (a) he has reasonable cause to examine the documentation, (b) the transporter lacks such documentation or the documentation is substantially at variance with the fact, or (c) the lawful severance and maintenance tax has not been paid on any part of such product. Furthermore, any transporter who does not possess the documentation as required by Section 53-3-201 or other proof of ownership or right to possession shall be fined an amount equal to the market value of the substance being transported but not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), the market value of such substance to be determined by the State Oil and Gas Board. Any such fine paid or collected shall be paid to the state treasurer for credit to the special oil and gas board fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 511, § 3, eff from and after April 12, 1983.